Maryland, session 2026, HB0410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Food” means:
(1) Any substance that is used as food or drink for human beings or as a
component of food or drink for human beings; or
(2) Chewing gum or any substance that is used as a component of chewing
gum.
(k) “Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter on the
container, other than the package liner, of a substance.
(l) “Labeling” means any label or other written or graphic material that:
(1) Is on a substance or its container or its wrapping; or
(2) Accompanies a substance.
(n) (1) “Package” means any container or wrapping of a consumer commodity
that is used for delivery or display to retail consumers.
(2) “Package” does not include any container or wrapping that is used only
for:
(i) Transportation of a consumer commodity in bulk or quantity to
a manufacturer, packer, processor, or wholesale or retail distributor; or
(ii) Shipment or delivery of a consumer commodity to a retail
customer, if the container or wrapping bears no printed material that relates to a particular
consumer commodity.
21–329.1.

HOUSE BILL 410 3
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “QUALITY DATE” MEANS THE DATE ON A LABEL AFFIXED TO THE
PACKAGING OR CONTAINER OF FOOD AFTER WHICH FOOD QUALITY MAY BEGIN TO
DETERIORATE BUT THE FOOD MAY STILL BE ACCEPTABLE FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION.
(3) “SAFETY DATE” MEANS A DATE ON A LABEL AFFIXED TO THE
PACKAGING OR CONTAINER OF PERISHABLE FOOD THAT COMMUNICATES THAT THE
FOOD SHOULD BE CONSUMED OR FROZEN BY THE DATE LISTED.
(4) “SELL BY DATE” MEANS A DATE ON A LABEL AFFIXED TO THE
PACKAGING OR CONTAINER OF FOOD THAT IS NOT A QUALITY DATE OR A SAFETY
DATE AND INDICATES STOCK ROTATION PRIMARILY TO A DISTRIBUTOR OR
RETAILER.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) INFANT FORMULA; OR
(2) BEER AND OTHER MALT BEVERAGES; OR
(3) A DIETARY SUPPLEMENT, AS DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. § 321(FF).
(C) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027 2028, A FOOD MANUFACTURER, PROCESSOR,
OR RETAILER RESPONSIBLE FOR THE LABELING OF FOOD ITEMS FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION THAT OPTS TO INCLUDE OR IS REQUIRED BY LAW TO INCLUDE A DATE
LABEL TO COMMUNICATE A QUALITY OR SAFETY DATE ON A FOOD ITEM
MANUFACTURED ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2027 2028, SHALL USE ONE OF THE
FOLLOWING TERMS, AS APPROPRIATE:
(1) (I) “BEST IF USED BY” OR “BEST IF USED OR FROZEN BY” TO
INDICATE THE QUALITY DATE OF THE FOOD ITEM; OR
(II) IF THE FOOD ITEM IS TOO SMALL TO INCLUDE THE LABEL
REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM, “BB”; OR
(2) (I) “USE BY” OR “USE BY OR FREEZE BY” TO INDICATE THE
SAFETY DATE OF THE FOOD ITEM; OR
(II) IF THE FOOD ITEM IS TOO SMALL TO INCLUDE THE LABEL
REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS ITEM, “UB”.

HOUSE BILL 410
(D) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027 2028, A PERSON MAY NOT:
(1) SELL, OR OFFER FOR SALE, A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED FOR
HUMAN CONSUMPTION ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2027 2028, THAT IS LABELED WITH
THE PHRASE “SELL BY”; OR
(2) SELL, OR OFFER FOR SALE, A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED FOR
HUMAN CONSUMPTION ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2027 2028, THAT IS NOT LABELED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027 2028, A FOOD RETAILER MAY:
(1) DONATE A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION THAT IS NOT LABELED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION; AND
(2) SELL, OR OFFER FOR SALE, A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED FOR
HUMAN CONSUMPTION LABELED WITH THE PHRASE “PACKED ON” IF THE FOOD
ITEM ALSO DISPLAYS A QUALITY OR SAFETY DATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(3) SELL, OR OFFER FOR SALE, A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED FOR
HUMAN CONSUMPTION THAT IS NOT LABELED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION
IF THE FOOD RETAILER PURCHASED THE FOOD ITEM ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2028.
(F) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT:
(1) THE SALE, DONATION, OR USE OF A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED
FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION AFTER THE QUALITY DATE;
(2) THE USE OF A LABEL THAT COMMUNICATES THE DATE WINE, A
DISTILLED SPIRIT, OR WINE–BASED OR DISTILLED SPIRIT–BASED PRODUCT WAS
PRODUCED, MANUFACTURED, BOTTLED, OR PACKAGED;
(3) THE USE OF SELL BY DATES THAT ARE PRESENTED IN A CODED
FORMAT THAT ARE NOT EASILY READABLE BY CONSUMERS AND DO NOT USE THE
PHRASE “SELL BY”; OR
(4) THE USE OR DISPLAY OF A LABEL THAT ALLOWS A CONSUMER TO
VIEW ONLINE INFORMATION ABOUT A FOOD ITEM MANUFACTURED FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION.

HOUSE BILL 410 5
(G) THIS SECTION DOES NOT REQUIRE THE USE OR DISPLAY OF A DATE
LABEL ON A FOOD ITEM UNLESS THE FOOD ITEM DISPLAYS A DATE LABEL.
(H) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027 2028, THE DEPARTMENT, IN
CONJUNCTION WITH THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND EXTENSION AND FOOD
DONATION ORGANIZATIONS, SHALL CREATE AN EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM AND
EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS TO INFORM CONSUMERS ABOUT THE MEANING OF
QUALITY DATES AND SAFETY DATES.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL POST ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE
THE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS CREATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
21–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) (1) “Grade A milk product” means:
(i) Grade A milk;
(ii) Grade A cream; or
(iii) Any other Grade A milk product that the Secretary designates.
(k) “Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance” means the recommended Grade “A”
Pasteurized Milk Ordinance published by the federal government.
(l) (2) “Grade A milk” means the milk of a cow, goat, or other hooved mammal
produced, processed, pasteurized, bottled, packaged, or prepared in accordance with the
Grade A Pasteurized Milk Ordinance.
(o) (1) “Milk plant” means any place where, for distribution, milk products are:
(i) Processed;
(ii) Pasteurized;
(iii) Bottled or packaged; or
(iv) Prepared.

HOUSE BILL 410
(2) “Milk plant” does not include a place where milk products are sold at
retail only.
(p) “Milk processor” means a person who owns, operates, or controls a milk plant.
21–424.
(A) After the milk product has been processed, each milk product shall be labeled
with:
(1) The description of that milk product under this subtitle or the rules and
regulations adopted under this subtitle; and
(2) Any other information that the Secretary requires by rule or regulation.
(B) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING TERMS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “QUALITY DATE” MEANS THE DATE ON A LABEL AFFIXED TO
THE PACKAGING OR CONTAINER OF A GRADE A MILK PRODUCT AFTER WHICH
QUALITY MAY BEGIN TO DETERIORATE BUT THE GRADE A MILK PRODUCT MAY STILL
BE ACCEPTABLE FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION.
(III) “SAFETY DATE” MEANS A DATE ON A LABEL AFFIXED TO THE
PACKAGING OR CONTAINER OF A GRADE A MILK PRODUCT THAT COMMUNICATES
THAT A GRADE A MILK PRODUCT SHOULD BE CONSUMED OR FROZEN BY THE DATE
LISTED.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) A MILK PRODUCT PROCESSED, PACKAGED, AND SOLD BY
DISTRIBUTORS DIRECTLY TO CONSUMERS; OR
(II) A BULK SHIPMENT OF A MILK PRODUCT BETWEEN
DISTRIBUTORS.
(3) (I) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, A MILK PLANT, MILK PROCESSOR,
OR OTHER PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR THE LABELING OF GRADE A MILK PRODUCTS
SOLD TO CONSUMERS AT RETAIL SHALL LABEL EACH GRADE A MILK PRODUCT WITH
ONE OF THE FOLLOWING TERMS, AS APPROPRIATE:
1. A. “BEST IF USED BY” TO INDICATE THE QUALITY
DATE OF THE GRADE A MILK PRODUCT; OR

HOUSE BILL 410 7
B. IF THE GRADE A MILK PRODUCT IS TOO SMALL TO
INCLUDE THE LABEL REQUIRED UNDER ITEM A OF THIS ITEM, “BB”; OR
2. A. “USE BY” OR “USE BY OR FREEZE BY” TO
INDICATE THE SAFETY DATE OF THE GRADE A MILK PRODUCT; OR
B. IF THE GRADE A MILK PRODUCT IS TOO SMALL TO
INCLUDE THE LABEL REQUIRED UNDER ITEM A OF THIS ITEM, “UB”.
(II) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, A PERSON MAY NOT SELL, OR
OFFER FOR SALE, A GRADE A MILK PRODUCT TO A CONSUMER AT RETAIL UNLESS
THE MILK PRODUCT IS LABELED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(4) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “SELL BY DATE” MEANS A DATE ON A
LABEL AFFIXED TO THE PACKAGING OR CONTAINER OF A GRADE A MILK PRODUCT
THAT IS NOT A QUALITY DATE OR A SAFETY DATE AND INDICATES STOCK ROTATION
PRIMARILY TO A DISTRIBUTOR OR RETAILER.
(II) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, A PERSON MAY NOT SELL, OR
OFFER FOR SALE, A GRADE A MILK PRODUCT TO A CONSUMER AT RETAIL THAT IS
LABELED WITH THE PHRASE “SELL BY”.
(III) SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT
PROHIBIT THE USE OF A SELL BY DATE THAT IS PRESENTED IN A CODED FORMAT
THAT IS NOT EASILY READABLE BY CONSUMERS AND DOES NOT USE THE PHRASE
“SELL BY”.
(5) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBSECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS RELATED TO:
(I) THE RESPONSIBILITY FOR AFFIXING TO PACKAGES OR
OTHER CONTAINERS THE QUALITY DATE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION;
(II) THE MANNER, STYLE, FORM, AND PLACE OF AFFIXATION OF
THE QUALITY DATE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION IN A
CONSPICUOUS PLACE IN A FORM THAT IS READILY SEEN AND EASILY UNDERSTOOD
BY CONSUMERS; AND
(III) ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT OF THIS
SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 410
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.